Utah statutes.
11-8-1.   Contracts for joint use, operation, and ownership of sewage lines and sewage treatment and disposal systems.

Any county, incorporated municipality, improvement district, taxing district or other political subdivision of the state of Utah which now or hereafter owns and operates sanitary sewer facilities (each of which is hereinafter referred to as a "public owner") is hereby granted authority:

(1)  To enter into long-term contracts with any other public owner or public owners pursuant to which sewage lines, sewage treatment and sewage disposal facilities, or any part thereof, of one or more public owners shall be available for collection, treatment and disposal, or any part thereof, of the sewage collected by one or more other public owners, or of sewage collected jointly, pursuant to such terms and conditions and for such consideration as may be provided in such contracts.  Annual payments due by any such public owner for services received under any such contract may not be construed to be an indebtedness of such public owner within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory restriction, and no election shall be necessary for the authorization of such contract.  Any public owner or owners so contracting to make available sewage collection, sewage treatment and disposal facilities, or any part thereof, may in any such contract agree to make available to such other public owner or owners a specified part of its facilities, without regard to its future need of such specified part for its own use, and may in such contract agree to increase the capacity of its facilities from time to time in the future if necessary in order to take care of its own needs and to perform its obligations to the other parties to such contract.

(2)  To construct or otherwise acquire joint interests in, and to own jointly, sewer lines, sewage treatment and disposal facilities, or any part thereof for their common use.  To such end, any public owner may sell to any other public owner or owners a partial interest or interests in any of its sewer lines, sewage treatment and disposal facilities.  Any public owner may issue its bonds for the purpose of acquiring such joint interest in sewer lines, sewage treatment and disposal facilities, or any part thereof, whether such joint interest is to be acquired through the construction of new facilities or the purchase of such interest in existing facilities, which bonds may be issued under the provisions and in the manner provided in any available law authorizing the issuance of bonds for the acquisition of sanitary sewer facilities by such public owner.

(3)  To operate jointly with any other public owner or owners, sewer lines, sewage treatment and disposal facilities, or any part thereof, which they may own jointly.

